New York, session 2025-2026, S8101.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 201-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 201-b. Designated parking for purple heart recipients. 1. Where 4 parking for a state agency occurs on properties under the jurisdiction 5 of the office of general services, and in any parking facility owned 6 and/or operated by the state of New York, such office shall provide for 7 designated parking spaces for persons who are recipients of a purple 8 heart award in accordance with the provisions of this section. 9 2. Such parking spaces must be located as close as reasonably practi- 10 cable to the state agency or facility and reasonably distributed so as 11 to provide convenient access to such facility. Such parking spaces are 12 to be used only by persons who have been awarded a purple heart as 13 evidenced by a special permit to be distributed by the commissioner of 14 motor vehicles. 15 3. The parking spaces designated pursuant to the provisions of this 16 section shall be clearly identified for use by purple heart recipients 17 which designation shall include conspicuous and permanently installed 18 above grade signs at a height of not less than five feet nor more than 19 seven feet and may include the use of specially painted lines or mark- 20 ings. Such parking spaces also may be marked as tow-away zones. 21 4. Each facility shall have up to two designated parking spaces under 22 this section which shall conform to the dimensions established by the 23 provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 25 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01468-01-5